Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.007

Notice—Use of internet—Rules.

(1) Notwithstanding any provisions of this title, wherever notice by publication is required by a bank, such notice may be undertaken by internet publication upon terms and conditions that the director may adopt by rule.

(2) Notice to shareholders required under this title may be undertaken by electronic means in the same manner as permitted for general business corporations under RCW 23B.01.410.

[ 2014 c 37 s 149.]